sv: Typ av huvuden för stativ och monopod: Boll; Ekvatorialfäste; Vätska; Växlad; Gimbal; Panorering; Panoramisk; Pistolgreppshuvuden; Videohuvuden; Övrigt
ru: Тип головки штатива-треноги/монопода: Шар; Экваториальная монтировка; Жидкостный; Шестеренчатый; Карданный; Панорамный; Панорамный; Головки с пистолетной рукояткой; Видеоголовки; Другой
ja: 三脚/一脚ヘッドの種類: ボール; 赤道儀; 流体; ギア付き; ジンバル; パン; パノラマ; ピストルグリップヘッド; ビデオヘッド; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça tripé/monopé: Tipo esfera; Tipo tripé; Fluido; Articulado; Gimbal; Inclinação; Panorâmico; Cabeçote de tripé; Cabeçotes para gravador de vídeo; Outro
en: Tripod/Monopod head type: Ball; Equatorial mount; Fluid; Geared; Gimbal; Pan; Panoramic; Pistol grip heads; Video heads; Other
cs: Typ hlavy stativu/monopodu: Kulová; Rovníkový držák; Fluidní; S ozubeným převodem; Kardan; Otočná; Panoramatická; Hlavy s pistolovou rukojetí; Videohlavy; Jiné
it: Tipo di testa del treppiede/monopiede: Sfera; Montatura equatoriale; Fluido; Ingranato; Gimbal; Manico; Panoramico; Teste con impugnatura a pistola; Teste video; Altro
zh-CN: 三脚架/独脚架云台类型: 球型; 赤道仪; 液体; 齿轮传动; 云台; 平底; 全景; 手枪式握把头; 录像磁头; 其他
da: Stativhovedtype: Kugle; Ækvatorial montering; Væske; Gearet; Gimbal; Pan; Panoramisk; Pistolgrebshoveder; Videohoveder; Andet
ro-RO: Tip cap trepied/monopied: Sferic; Montura ecuatorială; Fluid; Cu angrenaj; Cardanic; Rotire orizontală; Panoramic; Capete cu mâner tip pistol; Capetele video; Altele
bg-BG: Тип глава за статив/монопод: Топка; Екваториален монтаж; Флуид; Редукторна; Кардан; Тава; Панорамна; Глави с пистолетна ръкохватка; Видео глави; Други
lt-LT: Trikojų ir vienakojų galvutės tipas: Apvali; Pusiaujinė montuotė; Skystis; Krumpiaratinė; Kardavinė; Padėkliukas; Panoraminė; Pistoletinio tipo rankena; Filmavimo antgaliai; Kita
nl: Type kop voor statief en monopod: Bal; Equatoriale montering; Vloeistof; Gericht; Gimbal; Pan; Panorama; Pistoolgreepkoppen; Videokoppen; Andere
es: Tipo de cabezal para trípode y monopié: Bola; Montura ecuatorial; Fluido; Engranaje; Gimbal; Panorámica; Panorámica; Cabezales con empuñadura de pistola; Cabezales de video; Otros
hr-HR: Vrsta glave stativa/monopoda: Kugla; Ekvatorijalni nosač; Fluidna; Zupčasta; Gimbal; Pan; Panoramska; Pištolja glava stativa; Videoglave; Ostalo
nb: Hoder til trefot/monopod: Ball; Ekvatorial montering; Væske; Giret; Gimbal; Panne; Panorama; Pistolgrephoder; Videohoder; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça de tripé/monopé: Bola; Montagem equatorial; Fluido; Com punhos; Gimbal; Lisa; Panorâmica; Cabeças com punhos de pistola; Cabeças de vídeo; Outro
ko: 삼각대/모노포드 헤드 유형: 공; 적도 장착; 유체; 기어; 짐벌; 팬; 파노라마; 권총 그립 헤드; 비디오 헤드; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta glave stativa/monopoda: Krogelna; Ekvatorialni nosilec; Fluidna; Z zobnikom; Gimbal; Ploščica; Panoramska; Pištolski ročaj; Video glave; Drugo
de: Kopftyp des Stativs: Ball; Parallaktische Montierung; Flüssigkeit; Ausgerichtet; Kardanring; Pfanne; Panorama; Pistolengriffköpfe; Videoköpfe; Sonstiges
vi: Loại giá đỡ ba chân/giá đỡ một chân: Đầu củ tròn; Đầu gắn chân đế xích đạo; Đầu dầu; Đầu có khớp răng; Đầu chống rung; Đầu xoay; Toàn cảnh; Đầu có báng tay cầm; Đầu quay phim; Khác
zh-TW: 三腳架/自拍棒轉軸類型: 球; 德式赤道儀; 流體; 齒輪傳動; 平衡環架; 平移; 全景; 手槍握把接頭; 視訊接頭; 其他
th: ประเภทส่วนหัวขาตั้งกล้องสามขา/โมโนพอด: ทรงกลม; ขาตั้งแบบอิเควทอเรียล; ระบบน้ำมัน; เกียร์; กิมบอล; แพน; พาโนรามา; หัวจับแบบด้ามปืนพก; หัววิดีโอ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ hlavy statívu/monopodu: Lopta; Rovníková montáž; Fluid; Prevodové; Gimbal; Panvica; Panoramatický; Hlavy pištoľových rukovätí; Videohlavy; Iné
fi: Kolmi-/yksijalkaisen jalustapäätyyppi: Pallo; Päiväntasauksellinen kiinnitys; Neste; Hammaspyörällä; Gimbal; Panoroiva; Panoraama; Pistoolikädensijallinen pää; Videopäät; Muu
el: Τύπος κεφαλής τρίποδου/μονόποδου: Μπάλα; Ισημερινή βάση; Υγρό; Γρανάζια; Gimbal; Τηγάνι; Πανοραματικός; Κεφαλές λαβής πιστολιού; Κεφαλές βίντεο; Άλλο
pl: Typ głowicy statywu trójnożnego/jednonożnego: Kula; Mocowanie równikowe; Płynny; Przekładnie; Gimbal; Miska; Panorama; Głowice z uchwytem pistoletowym; Głowice wideo; Inne
tr: Tripod/Monopod başlık türü: Küresel (Ball); Ekvatoral (Equatorial); Sıvı (Fluid); Dişli (Geared); Gimbal; Pan; Panoramik; Kavrama (pistol grip); Video başlıkları; Diğer
hu: Háromlábú/egylábú állvány fejének típusa: Labda; Ekvatoriális tartó; Folyadék; Fogaskerekes; Gimbal; Pan; Panoráma; Pisztolymarkolat-fejek; Videófejek; Egyéb
fr: Type de têtes de trépieds et monopodes: Balle; Monture équatoriale; Fluide; À engrenage; À cardan; Pan; Panoramique; Têtes de poignée pistolet; Têtes vidéo; Autre